Washington statutes.
RCW 9.55.020

Witness refusing to attend legislature or committee or to testify.

Every person duly summoned to attend as a witness before either house of the legislature of this state, or any committee thereof authorized to summon witnesses, who shall refuse or neglect, without lawful excuse, to attend pursuant to such summons, or who shall willfully refuse to be sworn or to affirm or to answer any material or proper question or to produce, upon reasonable notice, any material or proper books, papers or documents in his or her possession or under his or her control, shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

[ 2011 c 336 s 313; 1909 c 249 s 86; RRS s 2338.]

NOTES:

Candidate buying liquor for another person on election day: RCW 66.44.265.

Legislative inquiry: Chapter 44.16 RCW.